West Virginia, session 2026, SB40.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. VETERINARIANS. §30-10-8. Requirements for Veterinary License. (a) To be eligible for a license to practice veterinary medicine under the provisions of this article, the applicant must:(1) Be of good moral character;(2) (A) Be a graduate of an accredited school approved by the board; or(B) Be a graduate of a foreign veterinary school and hold a certificate of competence issued by a foreign veterinary graduate educational organization as approved by the board;(3) Have passed the examinations required by the board;(4) Be at least 18 years of age;(5) Be a citizen of the United States or be eligible for employment in the United States;(6) Not have been convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude;(7) Not have been convicted of a felony under the laws of any jurisdiction within five years preceding the date of application for licensure which conviction remains unreversed; and(8) Not have been convicted of a misdemeanor or a felony under the laws of any jurisdiction at any time if the offense for which the applicant was convicted related to the practice of veterinary medicine or animal abuse or neglect.(b) A person seeking a license under the provisions of this article shall submit an application on a form prescribed by the board and pay all applicable fees.(c) An applicant from another jurisdiction shall comply with all the requirements of this article section: Provided, That the board may issue a license to an applicant who holds and, for the five years immediately preceding the submission of his or her application, has held an active license, or similar credential, in good standing to practice veterinary medicine in a state, district, or territory of the United States that has licensure requirements that are substantially equivalent to the requirements of this article, and who avers that his or her license has never been suspended or revoked as a result of a disciplinary action in any state, district, or territory in which he or she has held a license to practice as veterinary medicine: Provided, however, That the board may require by rule, promulgated pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq., that an applicant must provide a letter of good standing or other documentation demonstrating that his or her license has never been suspended or revoked as a result of a disciplinary action in each state, district, or territory where he or she holds and has held a license.(d) A license to practice veterinary medicine issued by the board prior to July 1, 2010, shall for all purposes be considered a license issued under this article and may be renewed under this article.(e) An application for a license to practice veterinary medicine submitted to the board prior to July 1, 2010, shall be considered in conformity with the licensing provisions of this article and the rules promulgated thereunder in effect at the time of the submission of the application. §30-10-10. Requirements for a registered veterinary technician. (a) To be eligible for a registration to practice veterinary technology under the provisions of this article, the applicant must:(1) Be of good moral character;(2) Have a degree in veterinary technology from an accredited school, approved by the board;(3) Have passed the examinations required by the board;(4) Be at least 18 years of age;(5) Be a citizen of the United States or be eligible for employment in the United States;(6) Not have been convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude;(7) Not have been convicted of a felony under the laws of any jurisdiction within five years preceding the date of application for registration which conviction remains unreversed; and(8) Not have been convicted of a misdemeanor or a felony under the laws of any jurisdiction at any time if the offense for which the applicant was convicted related to the practice of veterinary technology or animal abuse or neglect.(b) A person seeking registration under the provisions of thisarticle shall submit an application on a form prescribed by the board and pay all applicable fees.(c) A person registered to practice veterinary technology issued by the board prior to July 1, 2010, shall for all purposes be considered registered under this article and may renew pursuant to the provisions of this article.(d) An applicant from another jurisdiction shall comply with all the requirements of this section: Provided, That the board may issue a license to an applicant who holds and, for the five years immediately preceding the submission of his or her application, has held an active license, or similar credential, in good standing to practice veterinary technology in a state, district, or territory of the United States that has licensure requirements that are substantially equivalent to the requirements of this article, and who avers that his or her license has never been suspended or revoked as a result of a disciplinary action in any state, district, or territory in which he or she has held a license to practice as veterinary technology: Provided, however, That the board may require by rule, promulgated pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq., that an applicant must provide a letter of good standing or other documentation demonstrating that his or her license has never been suspended or revoked as a result of a disciplinary action in each state, district, or territory where he or she holds and has held a license.